Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB985.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Tax-exempt Property Municipal Assistance Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Common level ratio." The ratio of assessed value to current market value used generally in the county as last determined by the State Tax Equalization Board under the act of June 27, 1996 1234567891011121314151617 (P.L.403, No.58), known as the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible municipality." A municipality that imposes a tax on real property determined eligible under section 6(a)."Fund." The Tax-exempt Property Municipal Assistance Fund established under section 4."Liquor tax." The tax imposed and assessed upon the net price of all liquors sold by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board under the act of June 9, 1936 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.13, No.4), entitled "An act imposing an emergency State tax on liquor, as herein defined, sold by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board; providing for the collection and payment of such tax; and imposing duties upon the Department of Revenue and the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board.""Market value." The value of property as calculated by the State Tax Equalization Board on an annual basis utilizing the common level ratio."Market value of tax-exempt property." The quotient of the base year market value of a property and the common level ratio as calculated by the State Tax Equalization Board."Municipality." Any of the following:(1) A city, borough, incorporated town or township.(2) A home rule municipality which is a city, borough, incorporated town or township."Qualified tax-exempt property." Real property that is exempt from local real property taxes and owned by one of the following:(1) The Federal Government or an instrumentality of the 20250HB0985PN2023 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal Government.(2) The Commonwealth or an instrumentality of the Commonwealth.(3) A political subdivision, except real property owned by the municipality in which the property is located.(4) An entity that has obtained the exemption from real property taxation under the authority granted to the General Assembly under section 2(a)(i), (ii), (iv) or (v) of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(5) A local authority.Section 3. Tax-exempt property compilation.(a) Compilation.--A county shall annually compile a list identifying the market value of tax-exempt property within the county.(b) Annual report.--Beginning in calendar year 2026, a county assessment office shall submit to the department an annual report providing the information required in subsection (c) and any additional information required by the department to administer this act. The report shall be filed by June 30, 2026, and each June 30 thereafter.(c) Contents.--The report required under subsection (b) shall be a compilation of all property located within the county that is exempt from real property tax as of January 1 in the year the report is required to be filed. The report shall contain the following:(1) The owner of each tax-exempt property.(2) The location of the property, including mailing address, name of the municipality where the property is located and the uniform parcel identifier.(3) The assessed value of the property.20250HB0985PN2023 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Payments in lieu of tax or other funding received under a Federal or State program based on the tax-exempt status of the property. The amounts of the payments shall be reported by the municipality to the county assessment office. If the municipality fails to timely report the information to the county assessment office, the county is not required to include the information in the report, and the municipality shall report the information directly to the department.(5) The millage rate for the tax on real property in effect in the municipality where the property is located as of January 1 of the year in which the report is required to be filed.(6) The assessed value of all property in each municipality in the county.(7) The market value of all property in each municipality in the county.(d) Failure to file reports.--A county that fails to provide to the department the report required under this section by July 31 shall cause all municipalities within the county to forfeit the right to share in the distribution of funding for the year in which the information was required to be reported. A municipality located within a county that has failed to provide the department with the required report may petition the court of common pleas to issue a writ of mandamus ordering the county to collect the data and file the report with the department.Section 4. Tax-exempt Property Municipal Assistance Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Tax-exempt Property Municipal Assistance Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money deposited into the fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of making annual distributions to eligible 20250HB0985PN2023 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipalities under section 6.(b) Revenue-sharing program.--All revenues received by the Commonwealth from imposition of the liquor tax shall be transferred to the fund and distributed as provided in section 6.(c) Timing of transfers.--The State Treasurer shall transfer revenue required to be transferred under this section in five equal installments before the last day of February, March, April, May and June of each fiscal year in which a transfer is required.(d) Appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for purposes of making distributions under this act.Section 5. Distribution of funding.Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be distributed by the department by September 15 of the following fiscal year in the manner required under section 6.Section 6. Tax-exempt properties assistance.(a) Eligibility.--A municipality is eligible to receive distributions under this section if the department determines that:(1) The municipality's total market value of tax-exempt property equals or exceeds 15% of the total market value of assessed property within the municipality.(2) For the first year of distribution of money under section 5, the municipality's median household income is within 115% of the Statewide median household income according to the United States Census Bureau's 2022 American Community Survey 1-year estimate.(3) For subsequent fiscal years of distribution under 20250HB0985PN2023 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 5, the municipality's median household income is within 115% of the Statewide median household income according to the United States Census Bureau's most recently published American Community Survey 1-year estimate. THE MUNICIPALITY'S TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF TAX-EXEMPT PROPERTY EQUALS OR EXCEEDS 15% OF THE TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF ASSESSED PROPERTY WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY AND THE MUNICIPALITY MEETS EITHER OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE MUNICIPALITY'S MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME THRESHOLD:(I) FOR THE FIRST YEAR OF DISTRIBUTION OF MONEY UNDER SECTION 5, IS WITHIN 115% OF THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME ACCORDING TO THE UNITED STATES CENSUS BUREAU'S 2022 AMERICAN COMMUNITY SURVEY 1-YEAR ESTIMATE; OR(II) FOR A SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEAR OF DISTRIBUTION UNDER SECTION 5, IS WITHIN 115% OF THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME ACCORDING TO THE UNITED STATES CENSUS BUREAU'S MOST RECENTLY PUBLISHED AMERICAN COMMUNITY SURVEY 1-YEAR ESTIMATE.(2) THE MUNICIPALITY HOSTS A COUNTY SEAT.(b) Revenue CALCULATION OF DISTRIBUTION.--The department shall annually distribute money available under section 5 to an eligible municipality based upon the following:(1) The municipality's total market value of qualified tax-exempt properties shall be divided by the total market value of qualified tax-exempt property in all eligible municipalities with the quotient expressed as a percentage.(2) The percentage under paragraph (1) shall be multiplied by the money in the fund at the end of the fiscal 20250HB0985PN2023 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year to determine the payment due to the municipality.(3) A municipality may not receive more than 10% of the money available. The following apply:(i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), if a municipality's allocation as calculated exceeds the 10% limit, the municipality shall receive 10% of the money available.(ii) If the department determines that more than one municipality's allocation as calculated exceeds the 10% limit, the department shall calculate the allocation to those municipalities against the total amount of money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year.(iii) For the remaining municipalities, the department shall recalculate the payment amounts using the formula in paragraphs (1) and (2), except that the recalculation shall exclude:(A) a municipality whose allocation exceeds the 10% limit; and(B) the amount equivalent to the municipality's 10% allocation.(4) A municipality may not receive an amount exceeding $100 per person based upon the population of the municipality as of the last Federal decennial census. The following apply:(i) If the department determines that a municipality's allocation exceeds the per-person limit, the municipality shall receive a $100 per-person allocation from the money available.(4) FOR THE PURPOSE OF ESTABLISHING THE MAXIMUM PAYMENTS A MUNICIPALITY MAY RECEIVE, ALL OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) IF THE MUNICIPALITY HAS A MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD 20250HB0985PN2023 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INCOME OF GREATER THAN 85% OF THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME, THE MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT RECEIVE MORE THAN $100 PER PERSON BASED UPON THE POPULATION OF THE MUNICIPALITY AS OF THE LAST FEDERAL DECENNIAL CENSUS CERTIFIED PRIOR TO THE YEAR OF THE CALCULATION.(II) IF THE MUNICIPALITY HAS A MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME FEWER OR EQUAL TO 85% OF THE STATEWIDE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME, THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(A) IF THE MUNICIPALITY'S TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF TAX-EXEMPT PROPERTY EQUALS OR EXCEEDS 15% AND IS NO MORE THAN 25% OF THE TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF ASSESSED PROPERTY WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY, THE MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT RECEIVE AN AMOUNT EXCEEDING $100 PER PERSON.(B) IF THE MUNICIPALITY'S TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF TAX-EXEMPT PROPERTY EXCEEDS 25% AND IS NO MORE THAN 50% OF THE TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF ASSESSED PROPERTY WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY, THE MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT RECEIVE AN AMOUNT EXCEEDING $125 PER PERSON.(C) IF THE MUNICIPALITY'S TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF TAX-EXEMPT PROPERTY EXCEEDS 50% AND IS NO MORE THAN 60% OF THE TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF ASSESSED PROPERTY WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY, THE MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT RECEIVE AN AMOUNT EXCEEDING $150 PER PERSON.(D) IF THE MUNICIPALITY'S TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF TAX-EXEMPT PROPERTY EXCEEDS 60% AND IS NO MORE THAN 70% OF THE TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF ASSESSED PROPERTY WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY, THE MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT RECEIVE AN AMOUNT EXCEEDING $175 PER PERSON.(E) IF THE MUNICIPALITY'S TOTAL MARKET VALUE OF TAX-EXEMPT PROPERTY EXCEEDS 70% OF THE TOTAL MARKET 20250HB0985PN2023 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VALUE OF ASSESSED PROPERTY WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY, THE MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT RECEIVE AN AMOUNT EXCEEDING $200 PER PERSON.(5) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A MUNICIPALITY'S ALLOCATION EXCEEDS THE PER-PERSON LIMIT, THE MUNICIPALITY SHALL RECEIVE AN ALLOCATION AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) FROM THE MONEY AVAILABLE. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(ii) (I) If the department determines that more than one municipality's allocation as calculated exceeds the $100 per-person limit, the department shall calculate the allocation to those municipalities against the total amount of money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year.(iii) (II) For the remaining municipalities, the department shall recalculate the payment amounts using the formula in paragraphs (1) and (2), except that the recalculation shall exclude:(A) a municipality whose allocation exceeds the $100 per-person limit; and(B) the amount equivalent to the municipality's $100 per-person limit.(5) (6) If the total allocations as calculated result in $1,000,000 or less remaining in the fund, the money shall be retained in the fund for allocation in the next fiscal year.(6) (7) If the total allocations as calculated result in more than $1,000,000 remaining in the fund, the department FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) THE DEPARTMENT shall recalculate the allocation amounts for the remaining eligible municipalities that do not exceed the allocation limitation under this subsection. The 20250HB0985PN2023 - 9 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department shall use the formula under this subsection, except that the recalculation shall exclude a municipality that exceeds the allocation limitation and the amount equivalent to the municipality's limited allocation. If the recalculation results in money remaining in the fund, the money shall be retained in the fund for allocation in the next fiscal year.(II) IF THE RECALCULATION IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) RESULTS IN MORE THAN $1,000,000 REMAINING IN THE FUND, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONTINUE TO RECALCULATE IN THE MANNER DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) UNTIL THERE IS $1,000,000 OR LESS REMAINING IN THE FUND OR THERE ARE NO REMAINING ELIGIBLE MUNICIPALITIES THAT DO NOT EXCEED THE ALLOCATION LIMITATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(III) ANY MONEY REMAINING IN THE FUND AFTER THE FINAL RECALCULATION DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) SHALL BE RETAINED IN THE FUND FOR ALLOCATION IN THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR.(7) (8) The department shall deduct the amount of any payment under section 3(c)(4) from the final payment to a municipality, and the money deducted shall be returned to the department and deposited into the fund for disbursement in the next fiscal year. If a municipality receives a payment from a government agency under section 3(c)(4) after the municipality receives a payment under this section, the municipality shall reimburse the fund the amount of the payment made under this section. In no case shall a municipality receive a payment under this act and a payment from a government agency for the same parcel of tax-exempt property in the same fiscal year. PAYMENTS MADE TO A 20250HB0985PN2023 - 10 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MUNICIPALITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN APPROPRIATION TO A COMMONWEALTH AGENCY FOR THE PURPOSE OF FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES ON COMMONWEALTH PROPERTY OR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS ON COMMONWEALTH PROPERTY, OR BOTH, SHALL BE EXCLUDED FROM THE DEDUCTION SPECIFIED IN THIS PARAGRAPH.Section 7. Regulations GUIDELINES.Within 180 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this act. The department shall submit the guidelines to the Local Government Committee of the Senate and the Local Government Committee of the House of Representatives upon completion.Section 8. Repeal.Section 2 of the act of June 9, 1936 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.13, No.4), is repealed insofar as it requires money to be credited to the General Fund.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0985PN2023 - 11 - <--12345678910111213141516171819